Connecticut, session 2026, HB05420.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (Effective from passage) The Office of Higher Education shall
2 conduct a study relating to postsecondary education in the state. Not
3 later than January 1, 2027, the office shall submit a report, in accordance
4 with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes, on the results
5 of such study to the joint standing committee of the General Assembly
6 having cognizance of matters relating to higher education and
7 employment advancement.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section
HED Joint Favorable
HB5420 / File No. 168 1

HB5420 File No. 168
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill has no fiscal impact. It requires the Office of Higher
Education (OHE) to conduct a study by January 1, 2027 regarding
postsecondary education in the state. It is anticipated that OHE has the
resources to complete the study.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
HB5420 / File No. 168 2

HB5420 File No. 168
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5420
AN ACT CONCERNING POSTSECONDARY EDUCATION IN THE
STATE.